GRAMMARS/SPANISH/FST2/src/lex-places.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8 ñ é
!# CONTENT:     place names
!# 		NOTE: should be further classified
!#
!# LANGUAGE:    SPANISH
!#
!# CREATED:	04-Aug-2008
!#
!# ============================================================================


Multichar_Symbols

+Prop +Place

+Sg +Pl +SP
+Masc +Fem +MF


!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# Continuation classes

LEXICON	MSG	+Masc+Sg	#;
LEXICON	FSG	+Fem+Sg		#;
LEXICON	MPL	+Masc+Pl	#;
LEXICON	FPL	+Fem+Pl		#;

LEXICON MSGPL	MSG; MPL;
LEXICON FSGPL	FSG; FPL;

LEXICON MFSGPL	MSGPL; FSGPL;

!# plural = singular
LEXICON MSP	+Masc+SP	#;
LEXICON FSP	+Fem+SP		#;
LEXICON MFSP	MSP; FSP;

!# masc = fem
LEXICON XSG	+MF+Sg		#;
LEXICON XPL	+MF+Pl		#;
LEXICON XSGPL	XSG; XPL;

!# masc = fem; plural = singular
LEXICON XSP	+MF+SP		#;

!# =============================================================================
!# MAIN LEXICON
!# =============================================================================

LEXICON ROOT
Abruzos+Prop+Place	XSP;
Aculco+Prop+Place	XSP;
Agochi+Prop+Place	XSP;
Aiguá+Prop+Place	XSP;
Ala+Prop+Place	XSP;
Alcester+Prop+Place	XSP;
Aldea% María% Luisa+Prop+Place	FSG;
Aldeanueva% de% Ebro+Prop+Place	FSG;
Algueña+Prop+Place	XSP;
Almere+Prop+Place	XSP;
Alpes% Albaneses+Prop+Place	MPL;	!montana
Alpes% Australianos+Prop+Place	MPL;	!montana
Alpes% Dináricos+Prop+Place	MPL;	!montana
Alpes% Fueguinos+Prop+Place	MPL;	!montana
Alpes% Julianos+Prop+Place	MPL;	!montana
Alpes% Maritimes+Prop+Place	MPL;	!montana
Alto% Longá+Prop+Place	XSP;
Amatlan+Prop+Place	XSP;
Andal+Prop+Place	XSP;
Anton+Prop+Place	XSP;
Aracatuba+Prop+Place	XSP;
Arcoverde+Prop+Place	XSP;
Ashara% Ramadan+Prop+Place	XSP;
Atvidaberg+Prop+Place	XSP;
Azrou+Prop+Place	XSP;
Bahía% Aguirre+Prop+Place	FSG;	!bahia
Bahía% Asunción+Prop+Place	FSG;	!bahia
Bahía% de% Algeciras+Prop+Place	FSG;	!bahia
Bahía% Dulce+Prop+Place	FSG;		!bahia
Bahía% Grande+Prop+Place	FSG;	!bahia
Bahía% Laura+Prop+Place	FSG;		!bahia
Bahía% Oso% Blanco+Prop+Place	FSG;	!bahia
Bahía% Thetis+Prop+Place	FSG;	!bahia
Bailadores+Prop+Place	XSP;
Banagi+Prop+Place	XSP;
Barletta+Prop+Place	XSP;
Bejuma+Prop+Place	XSP;
Bermeja+Prop+Place	XSP;
Boa% Vista+Prop+Place	XSP;
Bonn+Prop+Place	XSP;
Bresno+Prop+Place	XSP;
Bustinza+Prop+Place	XSP;
Calarcá+Prop+Place	XSP;
Campo% Gallo+Prop+Place	XSP;
Capitán% Bado+Prop+Place	XSP;
Casale% Monferrato+Prop+Place	XSP;
Cerrito+Prop+Place	XSP;
Chantilly+Prop+Place	XSP;
Chimalpa+Prop+Place	XSP;
Ciudad% Bolívar+Prop+Place	XSP;
Coatzacoalcos+Prop+Place	XSP;
Colonia% Seré+Prop+Place	XSP;
Cottbus+Prop+Place	XSP;
Donard+Prop+Place	XSP;
El% Ahogado+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Alisal+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Ampurdán+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Arañado+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Aserradero+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Aybal+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Bajío+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Baztán+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Bolsón+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Brabante+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Burgo+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Cadillo+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Cambiado+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Caribe+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Carmen+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Carrizalillo+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Central+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Chaparro+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Chiflón+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Chorro+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Cocuy+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Condado+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Copinol+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Cuy+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Dividive+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Dorado+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Espinillo+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Fical+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Granillo+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Guayabo+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Hoyo+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Junko+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Maestrazgo+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Manteco+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Mayoco+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Mirador+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Molle+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Nisperal+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Pajonal+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Pampero+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Paso+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Peloponeso+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Peregrino+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Piamonte+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Pingo+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Pluma+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Potrerillo+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Quemado+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Realito+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Retamo+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Rodeo+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Saladillo+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Santuario+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Socorro+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Suncho+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Tala+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Terrero+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Trébol+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Vence+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Yaque+Prop+Place	MSG;
El% Zungaro+Prop+Place	MSG;
Fidenza+Prop+Place	XSP;
General% Pinto+Prop+Place	XSP;
Harlingen+Prop+Place	XSP;
Irapa+Prop+Place	XSP;
Kurdistán+Prop+Place	XSP;
La% Alameda% Roosevelt+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Alpujarra+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Arabia+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Asunción+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Azulita+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Bélgica+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Boca+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Brisa+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Calera+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Capilla+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Ceiba% de% Guadaulpe+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Ceibita+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Celia+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Chacra+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Cisterna+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Colmena+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Consulta+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Crucita+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Dorada+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Escondida+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Fe+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Floresta+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Fonda+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Fría+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Granja+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Guadalupe+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Guajira+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Hondura+Prop+Place	FSG;
Laponia+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Ligua+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Mancha+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Mascota+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Mira+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Noria+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Orotava+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Paila+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Paloma+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Para+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Pena+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Piedad+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Playa+Prop+Place	FSG;
Laponia+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Quiaca+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Rabida+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Rica+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Rochelle+Prop+Place	FSG;
Las% Acequias+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Achupallas+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Alpujarras+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Américas+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Antillas+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Aradas+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Breñas+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Cañas+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Carolinas+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Choapas+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Dos% Marías+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Dunas+Prop+Place	FPL;
La% Serena+Prop+Place	FSG;
Las% Filas+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Flores+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Guaras+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Heras+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Higueras+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Hurdes+Prop+Place	FPL;
La% Sierrita+Prop+Place	FSG;
Las% Jurdes+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Lajas+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Lajitas+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Lomitas+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Lucayas+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Maldivas+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Manos+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Margaritas+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Marías+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Marismas+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Mercedes% del% Llano+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Mercedes+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Minas+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Nieves+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Palmeras+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Parejas+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Perdices+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Piedras+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Puertas+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Rosas+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Tejerías+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Toscas+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Varas+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Varillas+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Vertientes+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Villas+Prop+Place	FPL;
Las% Vueltas+Prop+Place	FPL;
La% Tiendona+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Uribe+Prop+Place	FSG;
La% Venta+Prop+Place	FSG;
Le% Puy+Prop+Place	MSG;
Los% Aldamas+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Alpes+Prop+Place	MPL;	!montana
Los% Anaucos+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Andes+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Avelines+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Balkanes+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Baños+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Blancos+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Brasiles+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Caracas+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Cardos+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Castaños+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Castillos+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Castores+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Charrúas+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Cisnes+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Comales+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Conacastes+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Cóndores+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Esclavos+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Garzones% Airport+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Guerra+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Guevaras+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Hernández+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Herrera+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Lagos+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Laureles+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Lirios+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Llanitos+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Masariegos+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Mochis+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Molinos+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Niches+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Pilotos+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Quenes+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Ramones+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Reyes% Acozac+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Reyes+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Ríos+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Santos+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Surgentes+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Teques+Prop+Place	MPL;
Los% Toldos+Prop+Place	MPL;
Luisiana+Prop+Place	XSP;
Makka+Prop+Place:Meca	FSG;
Medinasidonia+Prop+Place	XSP;
Montería+Prop+Place	XSP;
Northampton+Prop+Place	XSP;
Paipa+Prop+Place	XSP;
Piendamó+Prop+Place	XSP;
Pueblo% Esther+Prop+Place	XSP;
Punta% Cardón+Prop+Place	XSP;
Río% Bravo+Prop+Place	XSP;			!rio
Salto% del% Agua+Prop+Place	XSP;
San% José% El% Carao+Prop+Place	XSP;
Santander% de% Quilichao+Prop+Place	XSP;
Sinamaica+Prop+Place	XSP;
Tarvisio+Prop+Place	XSP;
Toay+Prop+Place	XSP;
Usulután+Prop+Place	XSP;
Villa% Gustavo% Díaz% Ordaz+Prop+Place	XSP;
Yuriria+Prop+Place	XSP;
